src-fst-morphology-affixes-nouns.lexc.md
* **LEXICON NMN_KOUŠ** : 106 kouš:kōuš
* **LEXICON NMN_KOUŠ-SG** : 106
* **LEXICON NMN_KOUŠ-PL** : 106

* **LEXICON NMN_SPLEIŠ** : 107
* **LEXICON NMN_SPLEIŠ-SG** : 107
* **LEXICON NMN_SPLEIŠ-PL** : 107

* **LEXICON NMN_VEIS** : 108
* **LEXICON NMN_VEIS-SG** : 108

* **LEXICON NMN_VEIS-PL** : 108

* **LEXICON NMN_PȮIS-SG** : 109

* **LEXICON NMN_PȮIS-PL** : 109

* **LEXICON NMN_KIĻG** : 110 kiļg:kilg
* **LEXICON NMN_KIĻG-SG** : 110
* **LEXICON NMN_KIĻG-PL** : 110

* **LEXICON NMN_VȮĻG** : 111
* **LEXICON NMN_VȮĻG-SG** : 111 vȯļg:vȱlg
* **LEXICON NMN_VȮĻG-PL** : 111

* **LEXICON NMN_TÄUŽ** täuž: adres 112

* **LEXICON NMN_TÄUŽ-SG** : 116

* **LEXICON NMN_TÄUŽ-PL** : 116

* **LEXICON NMN_VAŖŽ** : 113 varž:vārd
* **LEXICON NMN_VAŖŽ-SG** : 113
* **LEXICON NMN_VAŖŽ-PL** : 113

* **LEXICON NMN_PIERZ** : 114 pierz:pīerz
* **LEXICON NMN_PIERZ-SG** : 114
* **LEXICON NMN_PIERZ-PL** : 114

* **LEXICON NMN_VÕRGÕ** : 115
* **LEXICON NMN_VÕRGÕ-SG** : 115 võrgõ:vȭrgõ
* **LEXICON NMN_VÕRGÕ-PL** : 115

* **LEXICON NMN_JÕUGÕ-SG** : 116 jõugõ:jȭugõ

* **LEXICON NMN_JÕUGÕ-PL** : 116

* **LEXICON NMN_VȬIDAG** : 117
* **LEXICON NMN_VȬIDAG-SG** : 117

* **LEXICON NMN_VȬIDAG-PL** : 117

* **LEXICON NMN_SIELDÕ** : 118
* **LEXICON NMN_SIELDÕ-SG** : 118

* **LEXICON NMN_SIELDÕ-PL** : 118

* **LEXICON NMN_NǬʼGÕ** nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119
* **LEXICON NMN_NǬʼGÕ-SG** nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119

* **LEXICON NMN_NǬʼGÕ-PL** nǭʼgõ:nǭgõ 119

* **LEXICON NMN_AŠŠÕ** : 120
* **LEXICON NMN_AŠŠÕ-SG** : 120

* **LEXICON NMN_AŠŠÕ-PL** : 120

* **LEXICON NMN_DRŪʼOŠÕ** drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121
* **LEXICON NMN_DRŪʼOŠÕ-SG** drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121

* **LEXICON NMN_DRŪʼOŠÕ-PL** drūʼošõ:drūošõ 121

* **LEXICON NMN_SOʼV** : 122 kaj:kaʼj
* **LEXICON NMN_SOʼV-SG** : 122

* **LEXICON NMN_SOʼV-PL** : 122

* **LEXICON NMN_KǬJ** : 123
* **LEXICON NMN_KǬJ-SG** : 123

* **LEXICON NMN_KǬJ-PL** : 123

* **LEXICON NMN_ǬʼJ** ǭʼj:ǭj 124
* **LEXICON NMN_ǬʼJ-SG** ǭʼj:ǭj 124

* **LEXICON NMN_ǬʼJ-PL** ǭʼj:ǭj 124

125, 126, 128

126

126b

* **LEXICON NMN_VȮŅ** : 127
* **LEXICON NMN_VȮŅ-SG** : 127

* **LEXICON NMN_VȮŅ-PL** : 127

* **LEXICON NMN_VAʼIT** vaʼit:vait 128
* **LEXICON NMN_VAʼIT-SG** vaʼit:vait 128

* **LEXICON NMN_VAʼIT-PL** vaʼit:vait 128

129, 130, 131

* **LEXICON NMN_KULTŪR** : 130
* **LEXICON NMN_KULTŪR-SG** : 130

* **LEXICON NMN_KULTŪR-PL** : 130

* **LEXICON NMN_SAʼGDIT** saʼgdit:sagdit 131
* **LEXICON NMN_SAʼGDIT-SG** saʼgdit:sagdit 131

* **LEXICON NMN_SAʼGDIT-PL** saʼgdit:sagdit 131

132
* **LEXICON NMN_VIĻȚ** : 132
* **LEXICON NMN_VIĻȚ-SG** : 132

* **LEXICON NMN_VIĻȚ-PL** : 132

* **LEXICON NMN_GĒRMAŅ** : 132
* **LEXICON NMN_GĒRMAŅ-SG** : 132

* **LEXICON NMN_GĒRMAŅ-PL** : 132

* **LEXICON NMN_EĻ** : 133
* **LEXICON NMN_EĻ-SG** : 133

* **LEXICON NMN_EĻ-PL** : 133

* **LEXICON NMN_BLĒʼḐ** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134
* **LEXICON NMN_BLĒʼḐ-SG** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134

* **LEXICON NMN_BLĒʼḐ-PL** blēʼḑ:blēʼḑ 134

135

* **LEXICON NMN_TAS** : 136
* **LEXICON NMN_TAS-SG** : 136

* **LEXICON NMN_TAS-PL** : 136

* **LEXICON NMN_NEITST** neitst:neits 137
* **LEXICON NMN_NEITST-SG** neitst:neits 137
* **LEXICON NMN_NEITST-PL** neitst:neits 137

* **LEXICON NMN_SĪEND** sīend:sīen 138
Stem	    change: No
Stød: None
Sg Nom=Gen: No
* **LEXICON NMN_SĪEND-SG** : 138

* **LEXICON NMN_SĪEND-PL** : 138

* **LEXICON NMN_LǞʼND** lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
* **LEXICON NMN_LǞʼND-SG** lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139
* **LEXICON NMN_LǞʼND-PL** lǟʼnd:lǟnd 139

140, 141, 142
**241**

**241 was ĀIGAST**

141
**87**
* Yaml: **N-analiiz** analīz+N+Sg+Ela => analīzõst
Change in stem: None
+Sg+Ela preceded by -õ-
consonant-final stem, long vowel in ultimate syllable
belongs elsewhere **N-kalendaar** kalendār+N+Sg+Ela => kalendārst

142

142

143, 144, 145

* **LEXICON NMN_VIŠ** : 144 viš:viš
* **LEXICON NMN_VIŠ-SG** : 144

* **LEXICON NMN_VIŠ-PL** : 144

145

* **LEXICON NMN_TĒʼḐ** tēʼḑ:tǟʼd 146
* **LEXICON NMN_TĒʼḐ-SG** tēʼḑ:tǟʼd 146
* **LEXICON NMN_TĒʼḐ-PL** tēʼḑ:tēḑ 146

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼḐ** lēʼḑ:līʼed 147 Hom3
* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼḐ-SG** lēʼḑ:līʼed 147
* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼḐ-PL** lēʼḑ:līʼed 147

* āigalē’ḑ # examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Nom examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Gen examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Dat examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Par examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Ins examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Ill examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Ine examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Sg+Ela examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Nom examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Gen examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Dat examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Par examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Ins examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Ill examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Ine examples:*

* āigalē’ḑ+N+Pl+Ela examples:*

* **LEXICON NMN_KĪNTŠ** : 148
* **LEXICON NMN_KĪNTŠ-SG** : 148 kīntš:kīn

* **LEXICON NMN_KĪNTŠ-PL** : 148

* **LEXICON NMN_KǬŅTŠ** : 149 kǭņtš:kǭn
* **LEXICON NMN_KǬŅTŠ-SG** : 149
* **LEXICON NMN_KǬŅTŠ-PL** : 149

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒŅTŠ** : 150 lēņtš:lǟn
* **LEXICON NMN_LĒŅTŠ-SG** : 150
* **LEXICON NMN_LĒŅTŠ-PL** : 150

* **LEXICON NMN_LĪEM** : 151
* **LEXICON NMN_LĪEM-SG** : 151
* **LEXICON NMN_LĪEM-PL** : 151

* **LEXICON NMN_AʼM** aʼm:aʼm 152
* **LEXICON NMN_AʼM-SG** aʼm:aʼm 152

* **LEXICON NMN_AʼM-PL** aʼm:aʼm 152

* **LEXICON NMN_AZŪM-SG** : 153

* **LEXICON NMN_AZŪM-PL** : 153

* **LEXICON NMN_VÕȚĪM-SG** : 154

* **LEXICON NMN_VÕȚĪM-PL** : 154

* **LEXICON NMN_KǬŅIM-SG** : 155 kōņim:kǭņim

* **LEXICON NMN_KǬŅIM-PL** : 155

* **LEXICON NMN_ĒTAM** : 156 ētam:ēitam
* **LEXICON NMN_ĒTAM-SG** : 156

* **LEXICON NMN_ĒTAM-PL** : 156

* **LEXICON NMN_SIDĀM** : 157

* **LEXICON NMN_SIDĀM-PL** : 157

158

159
* Yaml: **armtõb, N-aandam, N-akaatwb**
**221**

160
**72**

* **LEXICON NMN_TAPTÕD** taptõd:taptõ 161
* **LEXICON NMN_TAPTÕD-SG** : 161

* **LEXICON NMN_TAPTÕD-PL** : 161

* **LEXICON NMN_TĪʼEDÕD** tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
* **LEXICON NMN_TĪʼEDÕD-SG** tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162
* **LEXICON NMN_TĪʼEDÕD-PL** tīʼedõd:tīedõd 162

* **LEXICON NMN_VĪDÕZ** : 163
* **LEXICON NMN_VĪDÕZ-SG** vīdõz: 162

* **LEXICON NMN_VĪDÕZ-PL** vīdõz: 162
* **:%^ConsRMnd PL-ELA/INE_ist ;** not same as 2012
* **:%^ConsRMnd PL-PAR_idi ;** not same as 2012

* **LEXICON NMN_TUOISTÕNZ** : 164 tuoistõnz:tuoistõnz
* **LEXICON NMN_TUOISTÕNZ-SG** : 164

* **LEXICON NMN_TUOISTÕNZ-PL** : 164
* **:%^ConsRMd PL-ELA/INE_ist ;** not same as 2012

* **LEXICON NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ** īʼdõksmõz:īʼdõksmõz 165
* **LEXICON NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ-SG** īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165

* **LEXICON NMN_ĪʼDÕKSMÕZ-PL** īʼdõksmõz:īdõksmõz 165

* **LEXICON NMN_MĪEZ** : 166
* **LEXICON NMN_MĪEZ-SG** mīez:m 166

* **LEXICON NMN_MĪEZ-PL** : 166
* **:%^ĪE2Ē%^ConsRM PL-ELA/INE_šti ;** 
* **:%^ĪE2Ē%^ConsRM PL-PAR_ḑi ;** 

* **LEXICON NMN_ROʼVZ-SG** : 167
* **LEXICON NMN_ROʼVZ-PL** : 167

* **LEXICON NMN_KÄBRĀZ** : 168 käbrāz:käʼbrāz
* **LEXICON NMN_KÄBRĀZ-SG** : 168

* **LEXICON NMN_KÄBRĀZ-PL** : 168
* **:%^StodRM%^VowsRM%^ConsRM PL-ELA/INE_īst ;** not same as 2012
* **:%^StodRM%^VowsRM%^ConsRM PL-PAR_īdi ;** not same as 2012

* **LEXICON NMN_MAIGĀZ** : 169 maigāz:maʼigāz
* Yaml: **A-maigaaz**
* **LEXICON NMN_MAIGĀZ-SG** : 169

* **LEXICON NMN_MAIGĀZ-PL** : 169
* **:%^StodRM%^VowsRM%^ConsRM PL-ELA/INE_īst ;** not same as 2012
* **:%^StodRM%^VowsRM%^ConsRM PL-PAR_īdi ;** not same as 2012

* **LEXICON NMN_NÕTKĀZ** : 170 nõtkāz:nõtkāz
* **LEXICON NMN_NÕTKĀZ-SG** : 170

* **LEXICON NMN_NÕTKĀZ-PL** : 170

* **LEXICON NMN_RIKĀZ** rikāz:rik 171
Stem change: Yes
Stød: None
Sg Nom=Gen: No
* **LEXICON NMN_RIKĀZ-SG** rikāz:rik 171

* **LEXICON NMN_RIKĀZ-PL** rikāz: 171

* **LEXICON NMN_BIKŠĀZ-SG** : 172 bikšāz:bikšāz

* **LEXICON NMN_BIKŠĀZ-PL** : 172

* **LEXICON NMN_ĀMBAZ** : 173 āmbaz:āmbaz

* **LEXICON NMN_ĀMBAZ-PL** : 173

* **LEXICON NMN_PŪŖAZ** : 174 pūŗaz:pūŗŗaz
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪŖAZ-SG** : 174

* **LEXICON NMN_PŪŖAZ-PL** : 174

* **LEXICON NMN_PǬĻAZ** : 175 pǭļaz:pǭļļaz
Stød: None
Sg Nom=Gen: No
* **LEXICON NMN_PǬĻAZ-SG** : 175

* **LEXICON NMN_PǬĻAZ-PL** : 175

* __LEXICON NMN_RĒNAZ__ : 176 rēnaz:rēinaz
* __LEXICON NMN_RĒNAZ-SG__ : 176

* **LEXICON NMN_RĒNAZ-PL** : 176

* **LEXICON NMN_TŌVAZ** : 177 tōvaz:tōva
* **LEXICON NMN_TŌVAZ-SG** : 177

* **LEXICON NMN_TŌVAZ-PL** : 177

* **LEXICON NMN_PŪORAZ** pūoraz:pūora 178
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪORAZ-SG** pūoraz: 178

* **LEXICON NMN_PŪORAZ-PL** pūoraz: 178

179

* **LEXICON NMN_VȬRÕZ** vȭrõz:vȭrõ
180
Sg Nom=Gen: No

181

182

183
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪʼDÕZ** pūʼdõz:pūʼdõz
Stød: Yes
Sg Nom=Gen: No

184
* **LEXICON NMN_VĪETŠÕZ** : 184

* **LEXICON NMN_LǬʼTŠÕZ** lǭʼtšõz:lǭtšõz 185

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒJI** : 186
Stem change: None
* **LEXICON NMN_SĒJI-SG** : 186

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒJI-PL** : 186

* **LEXICON NMN_AKKIJI** : 187
**123**
* Yaml: **N-akkiji**
Stem change: None
* **LEXICON NMN_AKKIJI-SG** : 187

* **LEXICON NMN_AKKIJI-PL** : 187

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼJI** lēʼji:lēʼji 188
**61**
* Yaml: **A-aeqbtiji, leeqji**
* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼJI-SG** : 188 äʼbțiji:äʼbțiji

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼJI-PL** : 188

* **LEXICON NMN_TUĻĻI** : 189 is this a noun no ʼ
* **LEXICON NMN_TUĻĻI-SG** : 188

* **LEXICON NMN_TUĻĻI-PL** : 188

* **LEXICON NMN_LÄʼBḐI** läbḑi:läʼbḑi 190
* **LEXICON NMN_LÄʼBḐI-SG** : 188

* **LEXICON NMN_LÄʼBḐI-PL** : 188

* **LEXICON NMN_NAI** : 191 nai:nai
Vowel length
Sg Nom=Gen: No
Stød: None
* **LEXICON NMN_NAI-SG** : 188

* **LEXICON NMN_NAI-PL** : 188

192

aʼigi:aʼigi

* **LEXICON NMN_PUʼNNI** puʼnni:puʼnni 193 tuļļi:tuʼļļi
**127**
Stød: Yes
Sg Nom=Gen: No
* **LEXICON NMN_PUʼNNI-SG** puʼnni:puʼn 193

* **LEXICON NMN_PUʼNNI-PL** puʼnni:punni 193

* **LEXICON NMN_KAȚKI** kațki: 194
**12**
* **LEXICON NMN_KAȚKI-SG** kațki: 194
* **LEXICON NMN_KAȚKI-PL** kațki: 194

* **LEXICON NMN_KUKKI** kukki: 195
**33**
* **LEXICON NMN_KUKKI-SG** kukki: 195

* **LEXICON NMN_KUKKI-PL** kukki: 195

* **LEXICON NMN_AIGI** aigi:aigi 196
**16**
Stem change: Yes (vowel length in 1st syllable)
* **LEXICON NMN_AIGI-SG** aigi:āigi 196

* **LEXICON NMN_AIGI-PL** aigi:aigi 196

* **LEXICON NMN_OUKI** : 197
* **LEXICON NMN_OUKI-SG** : 197 ouki:ōuki

* **LEXICON NMN_OUKI-PL** : 197

* **LEXICON NMN_PAŖĪ** : 198 paŗī:paŗŗī
* **LEXICON NMN_PAŖĪ-SG** : 198

* **LEXICON NMN_PAŖĪ-PL** : 198
* **:%^CC2Cž PL-PAR_i ;** paŗrīži ?

199

* **LEXICON NMN_AʼBLI** aʼbli:aʼbli 200
**567**
* Yaml: **aainagi**
Stem change: None

* **LEXICON NMN_AʼBLI-SG** aʼbli:aʼbli 200

* **LEXICON NMN_AʼBLI-PL** aʼbli:aʼbli 200

* **LEXICON NMN_SĒMI** : 201
* Yaml: **A-ooqgi**
* **LEXICON NMN_SĒMI-SG** : 201
* **LEXICON NMN_SĒMI-PL** : 201

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼMI** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202
* Yaml: **A-aqrlimi**

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼMI-SG** lēʼmi:lēʼmi 202

* **LEXICON NMN_LĒʼMI-PL** lēʼmi:lēmi 202

* **LEXICON NMN_ALĪZ** : 203
* Yaml: **N-aliiz**
* **LEXICON NMN_ALĪZ-SG** : 203

* **LEXICON NMN_ALĪZ-PL** : 203

* **LEXICON NMN_NȬŖKÕZ** : 204
* Yaml: **N-nwwrkwz**
* **LEXICON NMN_NȬŖKÕZ-SG** : 204
* **LEXICON NMN_NȬŖKÕZ-PL** : 204

* **LEXICON NMN_KATŪKS** : 205
* Yaml: **N-katuuks**
* **LEXICON NMN_KATŪKS-PL** : 205
* **LEXICON NMN_ĀNDÕKS** āndõks: 206
* Yaml: **N-aandwks**
* **LEXICON NMN_ĀNDÕKS-PL** āndõks: 206
* **LEXICON NMN_KĒRATÕKS** kēratõks:kēratõks 207
* Yaml: **N-keeratwks**

* **LEXICON NMN_KĒRATÕKS-PL** kēratõks:kēratõks 207

* **LEXICON NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS** äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208
* Yaml: **N-aeqbtwks**

* **LEXICON NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS-SG** äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208

* **LEXICON NMN_ÄʼBȚÕKS-PL** äʼbțõks:äbțõks 208

* **LEXICON NMN_VARĪKŠ** : 209
* Yaml: **A-krwbiizh, N-variiksh**
* **LEXICON NMN_VARĪKŠ-SG** : 209

* **LEXICON NMN_VARĪKŠ-PL** : 209

* **LEXICON NMN_UKŠ** : 210 ukš:uks
* Yaml: **N-uksh**
* **LEXICON NMN_UKŠ-SG** : 210
* **LEXICON NMN_UKŠ-PL** : 210

211
* Yaml: **N-laepsh** läpš:laps

* **LEXICON NMN_LÄPŠ-PL** läpš:laps 211

212
* Yaml: **N-rishtiing**
* **LEXICON NMN_ROʼVZT-PL** roʼvzt:roʼvzt 212

* **LEXICON NMN_TUʼĻ** : 213 tuʼļ:tūʼl
* Yaml: **N-tuqlj**
* **LEXICON NMN_TUʼĻ-SG** : 213
* **LEXICON NMN_TUʼĻ-PL** : 213

* **LEXICON NMN_TŪĻ** tūļ:tūl 214

* **LEXICON NMN_TŪĻ-PL** tūļ:tūl 215

* **LEXICON NMN_KĒĻ** kēļ:kīel 215

* **LEXICON NMN_KĒĻ-PL** kēļ:kīel 215

* **LEXICON NMN_PŪOL** : 216
* **LEXICON NMN_PŪOL-SG** : 216

* **LEXICON NMN_PŪOL-PL** : 216
